Nebraska, session 109, LB1234.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
Section 1. The State of Nebraska adopts the Freestanding Birth
Center Act in the form substantially as follows:
I. PURPOSE AND SCOPE
A. Freestanding birth centers, as defined in Section II, provide
health care services within a home-like environment, which is different
from and outside of the hospital setting, while promoting safety and
quality care for patients and their newborn infants.
B. Birth centers shall be licensed by the state Licensing Agency.
The Licensing Agency shall adopt these standards for governing the
licensure and regulation of such birth centers.
C. Birth centers shall be licensed to provide services of labor,
birth, and early postpartum and newborn care to patients experiencing
low-risk pregnancies, as defined in Section II, and their newborns.
Nothing in the Freestanding Birth Center Act shall restrict the scope of
practice of the Licensed Provider to perform other outpatient services in
space that is shared with or adjacent to the birth center and which may
be regulated under other facility licensure, the Licensed Provider's
professional license, or both.
D. Birth centers are low-volume facilities limited to low-risk
perinatal care, and do not employ the use of regional or general
anesthesia. Birth centers shall not be restricted by any Certificate of
Need laws regulating hospitals and ambulatory surgical centers.
E. Admission to a birth center for labor and delivery shall be
limited to low-risk, uncomplicated pregnancies, with anticipated
spontaneous vaginal delivery, which, as determined by history of prenatal
care and ongoing assessment of risk criteria, indicates the likelihood of
an uncomplicated birth.
F. No person, entity, or facility shall represent itself as a "birth
center" or use the term "birth center" as its title, in its advertising,
publications, or other form of communication, unless licensed as a birth
center in accordance with the provisions herein.
-2-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
G. A birth center shall employ a clinical director who is a
certified nurse midwife.
II. DEFINITIONS
A. The terms defined in this section shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
B. Applicant: Any person, entity, or organization which qualifies
and submits an application seeking licensure to own, establish, and
operate a birth center under the Freestanding Birth Center Act.
C. CABC: Commission for the Accreditation of Birth Centers. An
accrediting organization dedicated exclusively to the quality and safety
of the operation and services of birth centers, regardless of state
regulations, ownership, primary care provider, location, or population
served.
D. Change of ownership: A change in the majority or controlling
interest in an established birth center to another person, entity, or
organization.
E. Freestanding Birth Center: A facility licensed for the primary
purpose of providing midwifery care, low-risk deliveries, and newborn
care immediately after delivery, for a stay of generally less than
twenty-four hours. A freestanding birth center may be a location for
additional services in shared or adjacent spaces, including outpatient
gynecologic care, primary care, and education and support services within
each Licensed Provider's scope of practice. This term does not include a
hospital, ambulatory surgical center, or the residence of the patient
giving birth. The terms "freestanding birth center," "birth center," and
"center" may be used interchangeably in the Freestanding Birth Center
Act, and shall have the same meaning defined in this section.
F. License: The certification issued to an applicant indicating that
the birth center meets the requirements for licensure outlined herein.
Licenses must be renewed on an annual basis.
G. Licensed Provider: An individual licensed or certified in this
-3-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
state to provide specific health care related services within a defined
scope of practice by the licensing rules and licensing body. For the
purposes of the Freestanding Birth Center Act, licensed providers may
include, but are not limited to: Certified nurse midwives, certified
midwives, or licensed midwives. The term provider may be used
interchangeably, and shall have the same meaning defined in this Section.
H. Licensed Maternity Care Provider: A Licensed Provider whose
professional scope of practice includes preconception, prenatal, labor,
birth, and postpartum care and early care of the newborn and who may be
the primary attendant during the perinatal period.
I. Licensee: The person, entity, or organization granted a license
to operate the birth center.
J. Licensing Agency: The Department of Health and Human Services, or
its equivalent, within this state.
K. Low-risk pregnancy: An uncomplicated prenatal course and the
anticipation of an uncomplicated labor and birth, which is determined by
ongoing assessment of risk criteria.
L. Midwifery: The provision of perinatal care by a midwife to a
patient, along with care of the newborn, support of the family unit, and
ongoing gynecologic health and wellness care, in accordance with the
professional scope and standards of practice of the profession's
certifying or licensing body.
M. Owner: An individual, a partnership, an association, a
corporation, or a combination thereof, that has a majority and
controlling interest in the birth center.
N. Patient: An individual and the individual's fetus or newborn
accepted to receive care and services provided by the birth center during
wellness care, pregnancy, labor, childbirth, and recovery.
O. Policies and Procedures: A written document which describes all
policies and procedures to be followed at the birth center, including,
but not limited to, administrative, clinical, and personnel procedures,
-4-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
which is to be maintained at the licensed premises, in either electronic
or hard copy format, and accessible by all members of the birth center
workforce.
P. Standards: Minimum requirements under the Freestanding Birth
Center Act.
III. LICENSING PROCEDURES
A. Licensure Fees
1. The schedule of fees for a birth center license is as follows:
(a) Initial licensure fee is two hundred fifty dollars.
(b) Renewal licensure fee is two hundred fifty dollars.
(c) Change of ownership license fee is two hundred fifty dollars.
2. An application for licensure is not considered complete until the
applicant pays the licensing fee. The fee shall accompany the application
form.
3. License fees paid by an applicant are nonrefundable.
B. Initial Licensure Process
1. No person, entity, or organization shall establish, conduct,
operate, or maintain a birth center without a license. The license shall
be issued only to the applicant named in the application, and only for
the premises listed in the application for licensure.
2. An application for initial licensure and the required licensing
fee shall be submitted to the Licensing Agency on the form provided by
the Licensing Agency.
3. Licenses are not transferable or assignable.
C. Issuance of Licenses
1. Applicants in substantial compliance with the Freestanding Birth
Center Act shall receive a certificate from the Licensing Agency naming
the applicant and birth center as a licensee under the act.
2. The license shall expire annually at midnight on the anniversary
of licensure.
3. The license shall be conspicuously posted in the birth center.
-5-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
D. Renewal Licensure Process
1. In order to renew its license, a birth center shall submit to the
Licensing Agency a renewal application, on the form provided by the
Licensing Agency, along with a renewal fee, at least thirty days prior to
the license expiration date.
2. If a birth center fails to renew its license prior to the date of
expiration, but submits the renewal form and fee within sixty days
thereafter, the birth center may renew late by paying, in addition to the
renewal fee, a late penalty of fifty dollars per month for each month or
fraction of a month that renewal is late.
3. In the event that a birth center fails to renew its license
within the sixty-day grace period following the license expiration date,
the birth center must reapply for a new license by submitting the
following:
(a) A completed initial application for licensure; and
(b) The initial license fee.
E. Change of Ownership Process
1. The birth center shall make reasonable efforts to notify the
Licensing Agency a minimum of thirty days prior to the change in
ownership of a majority or controlling interest.
2. A change of ownership application and fee must be received by the
Licensing Agency before the license may be issued.
3. A change of ownership is considered effective when the name of
the licensee reflected on the license certificate is changed by the
Licensing Agency to reflect the name of the applicant applying for the
change of ownership.
F. Suspension, Revocation, Refusal to Renew
1. The Licensing Agency may deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to
renew a license if the birth center substantially violates a requirement
of the Freestanding Birth Center Act.
2. If the Licensing Agency proposes to deny, suspend, revoke, or
-6-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
refuse to renew a license, the Licensing Agency shall send a notice of
the proposed action to the birth center at least sixty days ahead of the
action's effective date. The notice to deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse
to renew a license shall state the alleged facts or conduct to warrant
the proposed action, shall provide an opportunity for the birth center to
demonstrate or achieve compliance, and shall state that the birth center
has an opportunity for a hearing before the proposed action is final.
3. The request for a hearing must be submitted to the Licensing
Agency in writing, within twenty-one days of the date of the notice of
proposed action. The Licensing Agency will provide an opportunity for a
fair hearing upon a center's timely request.
4. If the birth center does not request a hearing, the center is
deemed to have waived the opportunity for a hearing and the proposed
action shall take effect.
G. Standards for Licensure
1. In order to be eligible for licensure, a birth center must be
currently accredited by the Commission for the Accreditation of Birth
Centers (CABC), or in the process of obtaining accreditation within six
months of the date of the application for licensure.
2. If the birth center loses its accreditation, the birth center
must immediately notify the Licensing Agency.
3. The birth center shall clearly define written risk criteria or
factors which, when present, would preclude the patient from being
considered a low-risk patient, and, therefore, ineligible for a birth
center birth.
4. Upon request, the birth center shall provide the Licensing Agency
with any material submitted by the birth center to the CABC as part of
the accreditation process, including the accreditation application, self-
evaluation report, accreditation decision letter from the CABC, and any
reports from the CABC following a site visit.
H. Limitations on Scope of Services
-7-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
1. The following limitations apply to the services performed at the
birth center:
(a) The use of general or regional anesthesia, including epidurals,
is prohibited.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), local anesthesia, systemic
analgesia, nitrous oxide, and other forms of pain relief may be
administered at the birth center if it is performed within the provider's
scope of practice, and as determined by the birth center's policies and
procedures.
(c) Labor shall not be induced, stimulated, or augmented with
pharmacologic agents during the first or second stages of labor or before
labor.
(d) Surgical services must be limited to those normally performed
during an uncomplicated birth, including episiotomy and repair. No
operative obstetrics or cesarean sections shall be performed.
(e) The use of vacuum extractors, vaginal forceps, or continuous
electronic fetal monitoring is prohibited.
(f) The risk factors that preclude a patient from delivering at the
birth center shall be consistent with national standards within the CABC
and other risk factors contrary to the birth center's established risk
criteria.
IV. PATIENT RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES
A. The birth center shall support and respect the rights of the
patients and their families, however they define their families. These
rights shall be posted in the center or otherwise made available to
patients.
B. Patient rights shall include, but are not limited to, the right
to:
1. Be treated with dignity, courtesy, and respect.
2. Receive equal treatment, regardless of race, gender, gender
identity, religion, ethnic background, sexual orientation, education,
-8-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
social class, physical or mental disability, economic status, or source
of payment.
3. Be assured of confidentiality.
4. Be informed of the benefits, risks, and eligibility requirements
for a birth center birth.
5. Participate in decisions relating to the management of their
care.
6. Give written informed consent prior to receiving services or
care.
7. Be informed of the process by which a patient may raise a
grievance against the birth center or one of the birth center's
providers.
8. Refuse treatment, at any time, even after treatment has begun.
9. Be informed of the center's plan for provision of emergency and
nonemergency care in the event complications arise.
10. Access a licensed maternity care provider twenty-four hours per
day, seven days per week, in accordance with birth center policies and
procedures.
11. Receive a statement of fees for all charges made by the birth
center.
C. The birth center may develop a plan for patient responsibilities
as it relates to the patient's participation in the patient's own plan of
care. If any patient responsibilities are developed by the birth center,
then the birth center shall notify patients of their responsibilities
alongside the notification of patient rights.
V. HEALTH RECORDS
A. The birth center shall maintain a health record for every
patient, in accordance with acceptable professional standards, for the
purposes of continuity and evaluation of care.
B. The birth center shall develop, implement, and enforce written
policies and procedures for the maintenance of patient health records, to
-9-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
ensure that care and services provided to the patient are documented and
organized in a way to easily facilitate the accessibility of information.
C. Policies and procedures shall include, but are not limited to,
the following:
1. A process to ensure that records will be updated accurately,
appropriately, and in a timely manner.
2. A plan to allow for the complete record to be provided in the
event of an emergent or nonemergent transfer of care.
3. A process for disclosing the record only in accordance with
federal HIPAA/HITECH and state privacy laws.
4. A process to ensure the confidentiality of patient records,
including the prevention of loss, accidental destruction, or the
unauthorized use and disclosure of the record or its contents.
5. A plan to allow for patient access to the patient's own record.
6. A plan to allow for the retention of the record in accordance
with federal and state law.
VI. REPORTING
A. The birth center shall have a mechanism for data collection to
assess efficacy and outcomes.
B. A certificate of birth shall be filed for each birth occurring at
the birth center, in accordance with the requirements mandated by the
local Office of Vital Statistics, in the county where the birth center is
located.
VII. CLOSURE OF THE CENTER
A. In the event of a permanent closure of a birth center, the birth
center shall make good faith efforts to develop a plan for continuity of
care for patients, and shall notify the Licensing Agency in writing
within thirty calendar days of the center ceasing operations.
B. The birth center shall return the original license certificate to
the Licensing Agency along with the written notification of closure.
Sec. 2. An individual or group policy of accident or health
-10-

LB1234 LB1234
2026 2026
insurance that provides newborn care or maternity benefits, not limited
to complications of pregnancy, may provide coverage for maternity
services rendered by a Licensed Provider or birth center under the
Freestanding Birth Center Act.
-11-